California, session 20252026, AB515.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 632 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:632. (a) In superior courts, upon the trial of a question of fact by the court, written findings of fact and conclusions of law shall not be required. The court shall issue a statement of decision explaining the factual and legal basis for its decision as to each of the principal controverted issues at trial upon the request of any party appearing at the trial. The request must be made within 10 days after the court announces a tentative decision unless the trial is concluded within one calendar day or in less than eight hours over more than one day in which event the request must be made prior to the submission of the matter for decision. The request for a statement of decision shall specify those controverted issues as to which the party is requesting a statement of decision. After a party has requested the statement, any party may make proposals as to the content of the statement of decision.(b) The statement of decision shall be in writing, unless the parties appearing at trial agree otherwise; however, when the trial is concluded within one calendar day or in less than 8 hours over more than one day, the statement of decision may be made orally on the record in the presence of the parties.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 632 is added to the Code of Civil Procedure, to read:632. (a) In superior courts, upon the trial of a question of fact by the court, written findings of fact and conclusions of law shall not be required. The court shall issue a statement of decision explaining the factual and legal basis for its decision as to each of the principal controverted issues at trial upon the request of any party appearing at the trial. The request must be made in writing, or orally if there is an official record of the proceeding being transcribed, prior to the submission of the matter for decision. The request for a statement of decision shall specify those controverted issues as to which the party is requesting a statement of decision.(b) The statement of decision shall be in writing, unless the parties appearing at trial agree otherwise. The written statement of decision shall be served on all parties who appeared at trial. However, when the trial is concluded within one calendar day or in less than eight hours over more than one day, the statement of decision may be made orally on the record in the presence of the parties. The statement of decision need not summarize all evidence admitted at trial.(c) If a statement of decision is not timely requested under subdivision (a), the court may announce its ruling on all relief sought without a statement of decision. Alternatively, the court may, in its sole discretion, issue a statement of decision even though one has not been requested.(d) If a party has requested a statement of decision, the court may order a party or parties to prepare a draft statement of decision within a specified time period. The court shall thereafter issue its statement of decision.(e) (1) Any party may, within 10 days after the statement of decision has been served by the court on the parties, serve and file objections to the statement of decision.(2) If no objections are filed, the statement of decision becomes final upon the expiration of the time for filing objections.(3) If objections are timely filed, the court may, but is not required to, set a hearing.(4) If objections are ruled upon, with or without a hearing, the ruling shall be served on all parties who appeared at the trial. The statement of decision, including any amended statement of decision that the court may issue after sustaining any objection in whole or in part, shall become final upon issuance of the ruling, unless otherwise stated in the statement of decision.(5) If any objections filed are not ruled upon, unless the court orders otherwise, the objections are deemed overruled and the statement of decision becomes final on the later of the following dates:(A) Thirty days after the time for objections has expired.(B) If there was a hearing on objections, 30 days after the hearing.(f) (1) The court may prepare and serve a proposed judgment or may order a party to prepare, lodge, and serve a proposed judgment, before or after the statement of decision is final.(2) Any party may, within 10 days after service of the proposed judgment, serve and file objections thereto.(g) (1) The court may, by written order, extend any of the times prescribed by this section. Further, at any time before the entry of judgment, the court may, for good cause shown and on such terms as may be just, excuse noncompliance with the time limits prescribed for doing any act required by this rule.(2) In any action under the Family Code, the court may also, by written order and upon a finding of good cause, shorten any of the times prescribed by this section.(h) (1) The Judicial Council shall adopt or amend all rules of court necessary to implement this section.(2) The Judicial Council shall prepare forms that a party may use to request a statement of decision and that explain the requirements prescribed by this section on requesting a statement of decision.(i) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.SEC. 3. Section 664 of the Code of Civil Procedure is amended to read:664. (a) When trial by jury has been had, judgment must be entered by the clerk, in conformity to the verdict within 24 hours after the rendition of the verdict, whether or not a motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict be pending, unless the court order the case to be reserved for argument or further consideration, or grant a stay of proceedings. If the trial has been had by the court, judgment must be entered by the clerk, in conformity to the decision of the court, immediately upon the filing of such decision. In no case is a judgment effectual for any purpose until entered.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 664 is added to the Code of Civil Procedure, to read:664. (a) When trial by jury has been had, judgment must be entered by the clerk, in conformity to the verdict within 24 hours after the rendition of the verdict, whether or not a motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict is pending, unless the court orders the case to be reserved for argument or further consideration, or grants a stay of proceedings.(b) If the trial has been had by the court, judgment must be entered by the clerk, in conformity to the decision of the court, by the following dates:(1) If no statement of decision is requested, within 30 days after the filing of the court’s decision.(2) If a statement of decision is requested, within 30 days after the statement of decision becomes final.(c) In no case is a judgment effectual for any purpose until entered.(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.